District of Columbia statutes.
38-1312

Violations; penalties.

(a)

Any person or persons who, directly or indirectly, participate in, aid, or assist in offering postsecondary education or the operation of a postsecondary educational institution by any unlicensed individual or individuals, association, or institution, or by any individual or individuals, association, or institution whose license has been revoked, who advertises or claims any authority to offer education, except pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or who violates a provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500.

(b)

Each day of noncompliance shall constitute a separate violation of this chapter.

(c)

Violations of this chapter shall be prosecuted in the District of Columbia Superior Court by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia.

(d)

Nothing contained in this chapter shall preclude any person from being subject to a penalty under provisions of § 28-3904, if the person engages in an unlawful trade practice.

History

Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-104, § 12
as added Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-217, § 2(h), 36 DCR 523

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1612.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law (Act 21-172), Jan. _, 2016, 62 DCR 13983).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(h) of the Higher Education Licensure Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-158, Oct. 16, 2015, 62 DCR 13715).